Massachusetts, session 194th, S2199.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Subsection (2) of Section 44D of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is 
hereby amended by striking the words “over the past five years” and replacing it with the 
following: over the past ten years 
SECTION 2. Subsection (3) of Section 44D of Chapter 149 of the General Laws is 
hereby amended by inserting after the words “showing the classes of work and aggregate amount 
of work on which the applicant is eligible to bid” the following:- ;provided, the division shall 
establish an annual inflationary increase, based upon the Producer Price Index as published by 
the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, for applicants seeking recertification.